Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 9.1 Commercial Transactions

11-9.1-1.
Receipts for installment payments for merchandise.

Any person selling merchandise on the installment plan shall give to every purchaser of the merchandise on the plan a receipt in writing for every installment paid on account of the price of the merchandise, and every such receipt shall show the balance of the price remaining unpaid after giving credit for the payment. Any person violating any of the provisions of this section shall be fined twenty dollars ($20.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1596, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 184, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 210, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 384, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §

6-15-1

.

11-9.1-2.
Fraudulent issuance of bill of lading.

Any officer, agent or servant of a carrier who, with intent to defraud issues or aids in issuing a bill of lading knowing that all or any part of the goods for which the bill is issued have not been received by the carrier, or by an agent of the carrier or by a connecting carrier, or are not under the carrier’s control at the time of issuing the bill, shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding five (5) years, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1029, § 44; G.L. 1923, ch. 320, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 473, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 6-24-45.

11-9.1-3.
False statements in bill of lading.

Any officer, agent, or servant of a carrier who, with intent to defraud, issues or aids in issuing a bill of lading for goods knowing that it contains any false statement, shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1029, § 45; G.L. 1923, ch. 320, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 473, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 6-24-46.

11-9.1-4.
Unlawful issuance of duplicate bill of lading.

Any officer, agent, or servant of a carrier who, with intent to defraud, issues or aids in issuing a duplicate or additional negotiable bill of lading for goods without placing plainly upon the face of each bill the word “duplicate” or some other word or words indicating that the document is not an original bill of lading, knowing that a former negotiable bill of lading for the same goods or any part of them is outstanding and uncanceled, shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding five (5) years, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1029, § 46; G.L. 1923, ch. 320, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 473, § 3; G.L. 1956, § 6-24-47.

11-9.1-5.
Unlawful shipment on negotiable bill of lading.

Any person who ships goods to which he or she does not have title, or upon which there is a lien or mortgage, and who takes for the goods a negotiable bill of lading which he or she afterwards negotiates for value with intent to deceive and without disclosing his or her want of title or the existence of the lien or mortgage, shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1029, § 47; G.L. 1923, ch. 320, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 473, § 4; G.L. 1956, § 6-24-48.

11-9.1-6.
Transfer of bill of lading for goods not in control of carrier.

Any person who, with intent to deceive, negotiates or transfers for value a bill of lading knowing that any or all of the goods which, by the terms of the bill, appear to have been received for transportation by the carrier which issued the bill of lading, are not in the possession or control of the carrier, or of a connecting carrier, without disclosing this fact, shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding five (5) years, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1029, § 48; G.L. 1923, ch. 320, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 473, § 5; G.L. 1956, § 6-24-49.

11-9.1-7.
Fraudulently procuring issuance of bill of lading.

Any person who, with intent to defraud, secures the issue by a carrier of a bill of lading knowing that at the time of the issue any or all of the goods described in the bill, as received for transportation, have not been received by the carrier, or an agent of the carrier or a connecting carrier, or are not under the carrier’s control, by inducing an officer, agent, or servant of the carrier falsely to believe that the goods have been received by the carrier, or are under its control, shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding five (5) years, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1029, § 49; G.L. 1923, ch. 320, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 473, § 6; G.L. 1956, § 6-24-50.

11-9.1-8.
Failure to mark nonnegotiable bill of lading.

Any person who, with intent to defraud, issues or aids in issuing a nonnegotiable bill of lading without the words “not negotiable” placed plainly upon the face of it shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding five (5) years, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1029, § 50; G.L. 1923, ch. 320, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 473, § 7; G.L. 1956, § 6-24-51.

11-9.1-9.
Issuance of fraudulent warehouse receipt.

A warehouse operator, or any officer, agent, or servant of a warehouse operator, who issues or aids in issuing a warehouse receipt knowing that the goods for which the receipt is issued have not been actually received by the warehouse operator, or are not under his or her actual control at the time of issuing the receipt, shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding five (5) years, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1549, § 50; G.L. 1909, ch. 270, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 315, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 468, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 6-25-51.

11-9.1-10.
False statements in warehouse receipt.

A warehouse operator, or any officer, agent, or servant of a warehouse operator, who fraudulently issues or aids in fraudulently issuing a warehouse receipt for goods knowing that it contains any false statement, shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1549, § 51; G.L. 1909, ch. 270, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 315, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 468, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 6-25-52.

11-9.1-11.
Failure to mark duplicate warehouse receipt.

A warehouse operator, or any officer, agent, or servant of a warehouse operator, who issues or aids in issuing a duplicate or additional negotiable receipt for goods knowing that a former negotiable receipt for the same goods or any part of them is outstanding and uncanceled, without plainly placing upon the face of it the word “Duplicate,” except in the case of a lost or destroyed receipt after proceedings as provided for in §

6A-7-601

, shall be guilty of a crime and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding five (5) years, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1549, § 52; G.L. 1909, ch. 270, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 315, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 468, § 3; G.L. 1956, § 6-25-53.

11-9.1-12.
Failure to state warehouse operator’s title in warehouse receipt.

Where there are deposited with or held by a warehouse operator goods of which he or she is owner, either solely or jointly or in common with others, the warehouse operator, or any of his or her officers, agents, or servants who, knowing this ownership, issues or aids in issuing a negotiable receipt for the goods which does not state that ownership, shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1549, § 53; G.L. 1909, ch. 270, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 315, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 468, § 4; G.L. 1956, § 6-25-54.

11-9.1-13.
Failure to take up warehouse receipt on delivery of goods.

A warehouse operator, or any officer, agent, or servant of a warehouse operator, who delivers goods out of the possession of the warehouse operator, knowing that a negotiable receipt the negotiation of which would transfer the right to the possession of the goods is outstanding and uncanceled, without obtaining the possession of the receipt at or before the time of the delivery, shall, except in the cases provided for in §§

6A-7-210

and

6A-7-601

, be found guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1549, § 54; G.L. 1909, ch. 270, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 315, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 468, § 5; G.L. 1956, § 6-25-55.

11-9.1-14.
Failure of depositor to disclose lien or want of title on negotiation of warehouse receipt.

Any person who deposits goods to which he or she does not have title, or upon which there is a lien or mortgage, and who takes for those goods a negotiable receipt which he or she afterwards negotiates for value with intent to deceive and without disclosing his or her want of title or the existence of the lien or mortgage, shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1549, § 55; G.L. 1909, ch. 270, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 315, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 468, § 6; G.L. 1956, § 6-25-56.

11-9.1-15.
Laundering of monetary instruments.

Whoever conducts or attempts to conduct a financial transaction: (1) with the intent to promote the carrying on of specified unlawful activity; or (2) with the intent to conceal or disguise the nature, location, source, ownership, or control of property believed to be the proceeds of specified unlawful activity; or (3) with the intent to avoid a transaction reporting requirement under state law; or (4) knowing that the transaction is designed in whole or in part: (i) to conceal or disguise the nature, the location, the source, the ownership, or the control of the proceeds of specified unlawful activity; or (ii) to avoid a transaction reporting requirement under the laws of this state or of the United States; shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or twice the value of the property involved in the transaction, whichever is greater, or by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) years, or both.

Whoever conducts or attempts to conduct a financial transaction: (1) knowing that the property involved in the transaction represents the proceeds of some form of unlawful activity, or has been or is being used to conduct or facilitate some form of unlawful activity; or (2) involving property represented as the proceeds of some form of unlawful activity, by a law enforcement officer or other person working at the direction or with the approval of an official authorized to investigate or prosecute violations of this section; shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or twice the value of the property involved in the transaction, whichever is greater, or by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) years, or both.

Whoever is convicted of conducting or attempting to conduct a financial transaction described in subsection (a) or (b) of this section is liable to the state of Rhode Island for a civil penalty of not more than the greater of:

The value of the property, funds, or monetary instruments involved in the transaction; or

Ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

As used in this section:

“Conducts” includes initiating, concluding, or participating in initiating or concluding a transaction;

“Financial institution” means any institution organized under title 19, or any institution having the definition given that term in 31 U.S.C. § 5312, where applicable, including, but not limited to, banks, savings banks, bank associations, trust companies, loan and investment companies, savings and loan companies, building-loan associations, credit unions, deposit-insurance companies, and any other depository required by law to file reports with the Rhode Island department of business regulation;

“Financial transaction” means a transaction involving the movement of funds;

“Knowing that the property involved in a financial transaction represents the proceeds of some form of unlawful activity” means that the person knew the property involved in the transaction represented proceeds from some form, though not necessarily which form, of activity that constitutes a felony under state law, regardless of whether or not the activity is specified in subdivision (7) of this subsection.

“Monetary instruments” means coin or currency of the United States or any other country, travelers’ checks, personal checks, bank checks, money orders, investment securities in bearer form or in such form that title to them passes upon delivery, and negotiable instruments in bearer form or in such form that title to them passes upon delivery;

“Specified unlawful activity” includes:

Any act or activity declared a felony pursuant to title 19;

Any act or activity declared a felony pursuant to chapter 28 of title 21;

Any act or acts prohibited by the Rhode Island Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act (RICO), chapter 15 of title 7;

Any act constituting a felony pursuant to this title.

“Transaction” includes a purchase, sale, loan, pledge, gift, transfer, delivery, or other disposition, and with respect to a financial institution includes a deposit, withdrawal, transfer between accounts, exchange of currency, loan, extension of credit, purchase or sale of any stock, bond, certificate of deposit, or other monetary instrument, or any other payment, transfer, or delivery by, through, or to a financial institution, by whatever means effected.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to duplicate or prevent the application or effect of 18 U.S.C. § 1956, or of any provision of state or other law imposing criminal penalties or affording civil remedies in addition to those provided for in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 95, § 1.